Wyoming statutes. Title 37 Public Utilities
Article 2. Bonds

§ 37-5-201.
Legislative findings. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 75, § 1; 2003, ch. 171, § 2; repealed by 2019 ch. 34, Laws 2019, ch. 34, § 4, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 37-5-202.
Definitions. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 75, § 1; 2003, ch. 171, § 2; 2004, ch. 83, § 1; 2006, ch. 15, § 1; repealed by 2019 ch. 34, § 4, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 37-5-203.
Authority revenue bonds; issuance; amount. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 75, § 1; 2003, ch. 171, §§ 2, 3; 2004, ch. 83, § 1; 2006, ch. 15, § 1; repealed by 2019 ch. 34, § 4, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 37-5-204.
Authority revenue bonds; security; payments after retirement. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 75, § 1; 2003, ch. 171, § 2; 2004, ch. 83, §§ 1, 2; repealed by 2019 ch. 34, § 4, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 37-5-205.
Exemptions from taxation. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 75, § 1; repealed by 2019 ch. 34, Laws 2019, ch. 34, § 4, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 37-5-206.
Bonds as legal investments. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 75, § 1; 2003, ch. 171, § 2; 2006, ch. 15, § 1; 2008, ch. 113, § 2; 2011, ch. 120, § 1; repealed by 2019 ch. 34, § 4, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 37-5-207.
State pledge not to impair bondholder's rights and remedies. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 75, § 1; repealed by 2019 ch. 34, Laws 2019, ch. 34, § 4, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 37-5-208.
Powers; duties; limitations. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 75, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 1995, ch. 199, § 1; 2003, ch. 171, §§ 2, 3; 2004, ch. 83, § 1; 2005, ch. 194, § 2; ch. 231, § 1; repealed by 2019 ch. 34, § 4, effective July 1, 2020.